Tennessee, session 114, SB2516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
SB2516
012632
- 1 -

The general assembly encourages municipalities to:
(1) Conduct, as part of their comprehensive planning process, an
inventory of their housing stock. Such an inventory should identify the total
number of housing units, the types of units, the age of such units, and the
location and distribution of such units. The inventory should also describe
vacancy rates, sales prices and rents, construction activity and permits, and an
analysis of the current development capacity, availability of infrastructure, and
land use ordinances and policies;
(2) Assess, as part of their comprehensive planning process, current and
future housing needs in the municipality in association with any housing
inventory. Such assessments should consider population trends and projections,
size and composition of households, income distribution, and the number of
households by age, cohort, or other appropriate populations. The assessment
should also identify any gaps that may exist between housing costs and
household incomes, the availability of housing units at various prices and terms,
and the average percentage of household income required to purchase or rent a
dwelling within the municipality. In conducting such an assessment,
consideration should be given to projecting future demand, demographics, and
housing needs; and
(3) Draft and adopt a pattern book for medium-density housing. Such
pattern book should include an outline of the processes for building medium-
density housing types within the municipality and varied design guides, including
floor plans, conceptual elevations, and a step-by-step description of the building
permit process to get such housing plans approved for construction.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012632